Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1209
Licensed pump installation contractor, defined.

Licensed pump installation contractor means an individual who has obtained a license from the department and who is a principal officer, director, manager, or owner-operator of any business engaged in the installation of pumps and pumping equipment or the decommissioning of water wells.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 9;

Laws 2001, LB 667, § 13;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1150.